District of Columbia statutes.
19-1504

Chapter supplemented by other law.

(a)

Unless displaced by a provision of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

(b)

This chapter does not limit any right of a person to waive, release, disclaim, or renounce an interest in or power over property under a law other than this chapter.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).